North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-03 Licenses and Permits
20.1-03-21.
Failure to turn over money collected under provisions of this title unlawful — Penalty.

It is unlawful for a person to fail or refuse to turn over any moneys collected or authorized to be collected under this title, or to fail or refuse to turn over and deliver to the director all applications, stubs, and mutilated and unused licenses and permits. The director may take appropriate action to recover from the person so defaulting, or on that person’s bond.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1975, ch. 106, § 201; 1991, ch. 231, § 43.

20.1-03-22.
Buying or shipping green furs — License required — Expiration of license.

No person may engage in the business of buying or shipping green furs in this state unless that person first obtains a license from the director. A license issued under this section expires on the first day of September following the date of its issue and may be issued only upon payment of the appropriate fee.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 44.

Cross-References.

Property rights in animal or pelt, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-07-02.

20.1-03-23.
Records to be kept by licensed dealers in green furs — Report to director — Penalty.

Each person licensed to engage in the business of buying or shipping green furs shall keep a true and correct record of each purchase of green furs made by that person. The record must show:

The date of the purchase.

The name and address of the seller.

The kind and number of furs involved in the purchase.

The amount of money paid to the seller for the furs purchased.

Any additional information as the director may require.

The information contained in the record must be furnished to the director on forms prepared by the director and under rules the director may adopt. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 noncriminal offense.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1985, ch. 272, § 11; 1991, ch. 231, § 45.

20.1-03-24.
Transportation of game or fish by residents having hunting, fishing, or fur-bearer licenses.

Any resident having a hunting, fishing, or fur-bearer license and lawfully in possession of any big game, small game, fur-bearer, or fish may:

Ship such game or fish by common carrier to the person’s residential address; or

Carry such game or fish on a common carrier or other conveyance to the person’s residential address.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10.

Cross-References.

Bag limit of big game, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-05-03.

Common carriers not to transport game or fish except during open season, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-16.

Possession limit of game birds, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-04-06.

20.1-03-24.1.
Permits for the transportation of big game.

Upon request, a resident or nonresident may obtain a permit for the transportation of big game from the director, deputy director, chief game wardens, district game wardens, or any law enforcement officer. The director shall determine the criteria for and the conditions under which a permit for the transportation of big game may be issued under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 245, § 1.

20.1-03-25.
Transportation of game or fish by nonresidents having a hunting, fur-bearer, or fishing license.

Any nonresident having a nonresident hunting, fur-bearer, or fishing license, and lawfully in possession of any big game, small game, fur-bearer, or fish may:

Carry such game or fish with the person on leaving this state.

Ship by common carrier, upon providing identification by displaying the person’s nonresident license, such game or fish, if the shipment is carried openly for content inspection and is plainly marked with a suitable tag bearing the person’s name, address, and the number of the person’s nonresident hunting, fishing, or fur-bearer license, and has attached to it a special shipping tag provided with the nonresident license form. The total number of such game or fish shipped in any one season shall not exceed the number the person may lawfully possess.

Ship upland game or migratory waterfowl by common carrier, upon identifying that person by displaying that person’s nonresident license, if the shipment is carried openly for content inspection and is plainly marked with tags issued by the director. These tags must be designed so they can be used only once.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 46.

Cross-References.

Bag limit of big game, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-05-03.

Common carriers not to transport game or fish except during open season, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-16.

Possession limit of game birds, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-04-06.

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Prohibiting, Limiting, or Regulating Fishing or Hunting in State by Nonresidents, 31 A.L.R.6th 523.

20.1-03-26.
Nonresidents — Taking and transporting of game birds — License. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 275, § 1.

20.1-03-27.
Proof of license to be provided officers upon demand — Penalty.

Upon the request or demand of the director, the deputy director, any game warden, or any peace officer, an individual who is hunting, trapping, or fishing immediately shall provide the appropriate license in paper or electronic format to the officer making the request or demand. Any individual who violates this section is guilty of a class 2 noncriminal offense.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1975, ch. 106, § 202; 1985, ch. 272, § 12; 1991, ch. 231, § 47; 2013, ch. 198, § 1.

20.1-03-28.
Duplicate licenses or permits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 265, § 2.

20.1-03-29.
Making misrepresentation in application for, or alteration in, license or permit unlawful.

No person may make any willful misrepresentation in the person’s application for a license or permit or make any alteration on a license or permit already issued.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10.

20.1-03-30.
Application for license issued by lottery — Forfeiture of fee if not eligible to apply.

The fee remitted by any person who applies for a license issued by lottery, when by any law or proclamation that person is ineligible to apply because of any waiting period, is forfeited. The director shall notify the applicant that the applicant is ineligible for this reason and the fee has been forfeited. The fees received by the department pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state game and fish fund.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 48; 1991, ch. 244, § 1.

20.1-03-31.
Using or claiming as one’s own the license or permit of another person unlawful.

No person may use the license or permit of another person or attempt to deceive the director, the deputy director, any game warden, or any police officer by claiming that license as that person’s own.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 49.

20.1-03-32.
Computer-generated license.

In addition to the license system under this chapter, licenses may be generated by a telephone, computer, or electronic system designated by the director. The director may accept payment by wire transfer, electronic transfer, or a nationally recognized credit or debit card for licenses issued under this section. A reasonable fee not exceeding the discount charged by the credit card issuer may be added to the payment as a service charge for the acceptance of the credit or debit card. The director shall determine which nationally recognized cards will be accepted for payments made under this section. If payment is made by a credit or debit card, the liability for a license purchased under this section is not discharged until the director receives payment or credit from the institution responsible for making the payment or credit.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 233, § 1.

20.1-03-33.
When an individual considered licensed.

An individual is considered licensed upon:

Submittal of any required information;

Payment of the appropriate fee; and

Approval of the director or representatives designated by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 233, § 2.

20.1-03-34.
Signature and possession requirements.

Signature and possession of license requirements may be waived by the director by rule for individuals licensed through license systems established under section 20.1-03-32.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 233, § 3.

20.1-03-35.
Social security number to be furnished.

The social security number of an applicant for any license or permit issued under this chapter must be recorded on the application unless the applicant is a foreign national to whom no social security number has been issued. A social security number recorded under this section is confidential. Beginning on January 1, 2008, any application that is printed in paper form for a resident or nonresident fishing, hunting, or fur-bearer certificate must be printed in a manner so that only the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number are recorded on the application, and the first five digits of the applicant’s social security number are not recorded on the application.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 141, § 19; 2003, ch. 382, § 2; 2007, ch. 220, § 1.

20.1-03-36.
Guides and outfitters to be licensed.

An individual may not act as a guide or outfitter or advertise or otherwise represent to the public as a guide or outfitter without first securing a license in accordance with this chapter and the rules of the director.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 223, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 6.

20.1-03-36.1.
Fee for guide or outfitter license.

The annual fee to receive a hunting guide license is one hundred dollars for a resident and four hundred dollars for a nonresident.

The annual fee to receive a fishing outfitter license is one hundred dollars for a resident and four hundred dollars for a nonresident. The annual fee to receive a fishing outfitter license is fifty dollars for a resident and two hundred dollars for a nonresident if the individual applying for the license has paid for a hunting guide or outfitter license for the same year.

The annual fee for a resident to receive a hunting outfitter license is two hundred fifty dollars for under ten thousand acres [4046.86 hectares] and five hundred dollars for ten thousand acres [4046.86 hectares] and over on which the outfitter provides services. The annual fee for a nonresident to receive a hunting outfitter license is two thousand dollars. The acreage must be presented by the county with a list of lessors by county in every application for outfitter licensure. The annual permit fee for day leasing is two hundred dollars. The acreage day leased by county for the preceding year must be provided to receive a day leasing permit.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a license is not required for a person to provide services on real property that person owns or leases for the primary pursuit of bona fide agricultural interests, for a nonprofit organization registered with the secretary of state, or for a person that acts as a booking agent for a person that legally conducts business as an outfitter. However, a person who has been convicted of a state or federal criminal game or fish violation within the last three years or whose license to hunt or fish is under suspension or revocation is not exempt from licensure and is subject to subsection 5 of section 20.1-03-37. A booking agent that refers an individual to an outfitter under this subsection may receive a fee or commission for the referral. The director shall determine the number of acres by county exempted from licensure by this subsection and shall publish the results. The director shall provide written information to the public on the possible liability exposure for outfitting under this subsection and on the benefits of liability insurance and proper training. For purposes of this subsection, a booking agent means a person that receives only a fee for referring or marketing the services of a legal outfitter in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 202, § 7; 2009, ch. 206, § 1; 2009, ch. 207, § 1; 2011, ch. 177, § 1.

20.1-03-36.2.
Guides and outfitters licenses.

Each licensee shall carry the license while afield and show the license to any law enforcement officer upon request.

Hunting guide and fishing outfitter licenses are not transferable.

Guide and outfitter licenses expire on March thirty-first of each year for licenses issued after March thirty-first in the previous year unless revoked at an earlier date.

The department shall deposit in the game and fish department private habitat and access improvement fund any funds collected under section 20.1-03-36.1 or this section from hunting guides and outfitters which are not used for the administration of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 202, § 8; 2015, ch. 178, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

20.1-03-37.
Guides and outfitters license qualifications.

An individual who is eighteen years of age or more may apply for a guide or outfitter license.

An applicant for a hunting guide license and an outfitter acting as a guide shall provide the director proof that the individual is certified in adult cardiopulmonary resuscitation or its equivalent and in standard or first aid or its equivalent.

An applicant for a hunting outfitter or fishing outfitter license shall provide to the director proof that the individual and the individual’s business operation are covered by general liability insurance against loss or expense due to accident or injury from outfitting services, at a minimum of one hundred thousand dollars per individual and three hundred thousand dollars per accident.

An individual must hold a hunting guide license for two years to be eligible to apply for a hunting outfitter license unless that individual provides proof to the department that the individual has been exempt under subsection 4 of section 20.1-03-36.1 and has been conducting outfitter or guide service as an exempt individual for at least two years.

The director may not issue a license to an individual who has been convicted of a state or federal criminal game or fish violation in the last three years or whose license to hunt or fish is under suspension or revocation. As used in this chapter, “conviction” means a finding of guilt, a guilty plea, a plea of no contest, a plea of nolo contendere, a judgment of conviction even though the court suspended execution of a sentence in accordance with subsection 3 of section 12.1-32-02, or a deferred imposition of sentence in accordance with subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-02 or an equivalent statute. The term does not include a finding of guilt which is reversed on appeal.

If an application is for a business association, the applicant must be an agent of the association to be held personally responsible for the conduct of the licensed outfitter’s operations, in addition to the association, and the applicant must be actively and regularly employed in and responsible for the management, supervision, and operation of the outfitting business. The department may only issue an outfitter license to a business applicant if the applicant is qualified to conduct the business of outfitting. A corporation or association may qualify for an outfitter license if a majority of stock is owned by licensed outfitters in good standing or landowners who own agricultural land used for the outfitting business, or if a limited liability company, the majority membership interest is owned by licensed outfitters in good standing or by landowners who own agricultural land used for the outfitting business. If a business entity owns, is a leaseholder in land, or provides compensation for the use of land, and directly or indirectly receives remuneration from hunting on that land, the business entity must be licensed under this title unless exempt under subsection 4 of section 20.1-03-36.1. A business entity may not conduct business operations through a subsidiary, contractor, or an agent that would permit the business entity to avoid this chapter. This section does not authorize any act or transaction prohibited by any other law of this state.

An applicant for a hunting guide or hunting outfitter license must have legally hunted in this state for part of each of any three years in a manner directly contributing to the individual’s experience and competency as a guide. The department may waive this requirement if the applicant proves that the applicant has legally hunted for parts of at least three years in other states and an outfitter employing that individual would suffer an undue hardship without that individual.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 220, § 2; 2003, ch. 202, § 9; 2005, ch. 221, § 3.

20.1-03-38.
Licensing guides and outfitters by the department — Rules — Inspections.

The director may license guides and outfitters and may adopt rules to regulate guides and outfitters. If the director requests a trade secret or proprietary information, the director shall request the information on a separate form, and that information is confidential and is not a public record subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota. The director may release this information, however, if it is aggregated so as not to identify any guide, outfitter, or client. Before engaging in rulemaking activities with respect to guides and outfitters, the director shall appoint a committee composed of guides, outfitters, and interested individuals and shall consult with the committee when preparing rules.

The director shall periodically inspect or cause to be inspected all outfitter businesses. All records, facilities, and equipment kept or used by the outfitter are open to inspection by the director or a game warden. Records may not be deceptive and must be kept in a manner and location that is readily accessible to the director or a game warden during normal business hours.

The director shall perform a background search for criminal and game and fish violations on each applicant on initial application and on each renewal.

The director may not issue a license to an individual to be a hunting guide or hunting outfitter unless the individual is proficient in the application of state and federal laws on the hunting of wild game. The director shall create and administer a written examination to test proficiency of hunting guides and outfitters in these laws. The director shall administer examinations at least twice a year; however, an examination may not be given within ninety days after the previous examination.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 202, § 10; 2005, ch. 221, § 4.

20.1-03-39.
Guides and outfitters restrictions.

The license of a guide or outfitter may be denied, revoked, or suspended, or placed on probation by the director if:

The licensee, while carrying out the business of guiding or outfitting, engages in conduct detrimental to the image and professional integrity of the guiding and outfitting industry;

The licensee willfully and substantially misrepresented that person’s facilities, prices, equipment, services, or hunting or fishing opportunities as a guide or outfitter;

The licensee has been convicted of an offense not listed in this section which is determined by the director to have a direct bearing on the licensee’s ability to serve the public as a guide or outfitter;

The licensee is addicted to the use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, or stimulants to the extent the licensee’s performance of professional duties is affected;

The licensee has become not qualified, or has violated any rule for the licensing of a guide or outfitter by the director;

The licensee is convicted of violating state or federal criminal law pertaining to hunting, fishing, or trapping, or if the director finds by clear and convincing evidence that such a violation has occurred;

The licensee provided guiding or outfitting services to a person that had not obtained the appropriate license for the species sought by that person; or

A licensed outfitter utilized any unlicensed person to perform outfitter or guide services on behalf of the outfitter. This subsection applies to outfitters regardless of whether the person who performed the service is otherwise exempt under subsection 4 of section 20.1-03-36.1.

For the purpose of administrative sanctions, an outfitter is liable if a guide violates a criminal provision of this chapter or a state or federal criminal law pertaining to hunting, fishing, or trapping while guiding on behalf of the outfitter. It is an affirmative defense if the outfitter reported the violation to the department or law enforcement when the outfitter discovered the violation or has not had more than two independent violations by a guide working on behalf of the outfitter in the previous three-year period and the outfitter did not aid in or attempt to conceal evidence of the violation. A guide is liable if a client violates a state or federal criminal law pertaining to hunting, fishing, or trapping if the guide knowingly aids in the violation or knows of the violation and the guide or client fail to report the violation to the department within a reasonable time.

Notwithstanding chapters 45-11 and 47-25, another person may not use a name, business name, fictitious name, trade name, internet address, world wide web uniform resource identifier, place of business, or telephone number of an outfitter who has been convicted of a violation at least three years from the time of the conviction except on permission from the director after a determination by the director that the new business is significantly separate from the previous business and the new business does not employ, contract with, or receive assistance from any person who has been prohibited from guiding or outfitting.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 202, § 11; 2005, ch. 221, § 5.

20.1-03-40.
Penalty.

Any person providing guide or outfitter services without a license, or while under suspension, revocation, or denial is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. The court must suspend an individual’s hunting, trapping, and fishing privileges for at least one year under section 20.1-01-26 if an individual provided guide or outfitter services without a license, or while under suspension, revocation, or denial, or guided on prohibited lands. Unless otherwise specified, other violations of this chapter are a class B misdemeanor. Each client guided is subject to separate and distinct offenses. In addition to this penalty, the director may initiate civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction as necessary to enforce this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, including an injunction to restrain a violation, without proof of actual damages sustained by any person. Any individual who commits for remuneration or compensation an act of fraud involving hunting or fishing or any individual who illegally takes or causes death to fish or wildlife for remuneration or compensation may be prosecuted for theft, fraud, or conspiracy under title 12.1 and is, upon conviction, liable for the higher amount between the actual compensation received or the value of the fish or wildlife illegally taken or killed.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 202, § 12; 2005, ch. 221, § 6.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

20.1-03-41.
Director’s powers for immediate suspension.

If the director determines by clear and convincing evidence that a substantial violation of state or federal criminal hunting, fishing, or trapping laws of this chapter by a guide or outfitter has occurred, the director may suspend, revoke, or deny a guide or outfitter license to the person violating the laws or provisions. In such a case, a hearing must be held within ten days of the director’s intended action and the person must be given notice of the hearing. The person may waive the hearing after having been notified of the person’s right to a hearing, in which case the action of the director takes effect upon signing the waiver. The director may serve notice of the hearing by publication if reasonable efforts to make personal service have failed.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 221, § 2.

20.1-03-42.
Guiding on prohibited lands.

A person may not act as a hunting guide or hunting outfitter on land the person knows is owned by the state unless the appropriate state agency permits or authorizes the guiding or outfitting, on private land enrolled by the department for purposes of hunting, on land in which the department pays in lieu of taxes, on federal lands without being authorized or permitted as required by the appropriate federal agency, or on private lands posted against hunting or trespassing without first informing and obtaining permission from the landowner to conduct guiding or outfitting on the land. If the landowner did not grant the permission in writing, there is a presumption that the permission did not exist.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 221, § 2.